src/fst/morphology/affixes/propernouns.lexc
! DIVVUN & GIELLATEKNO - OPEN SOURCE GRAMMARS FOR SÁMI AND OTHER LANGUAGES
! COPYRIGHT © 2000-2010 THE UNIVERSITY OF TROMSØ & THE NORWEGIAN SÁMI PARLIAMENT
! HTTP://GIELLATEKNO.UIT.NO & HTTP://DIVVUN.NO
!
! THIS PROGRAM IS FREE SOFTWARE; YOU CAN REDISTRIBUTE AND/OR MODIFY
! THIS FILE UNDER THE TERMS OF THE GNU GENERAL PUBLIC LICENSE AS PUBLISHED BY
! THE FREE SOFTWARE FOUNDATION, EITHER VERSION 3 OF THE LICENSE, OR
! (AT YOUR OPTION) ANY LATER VERSION. THE GNU GENERAL PUBLIC LICENSE
! IS FOUND AT HTTP://WWW.GNU.ORG/LICENSES/GPL.HTML. IT IS
! ALSO AVAILABLE IN THE FILE $GTHOME/LICENSE.TXT.
!
! OTHER LICENSING OPTIONS ARE AVAILABLE UPON REQUEST, PLEASE CONTACT
! GIELLATEKNO@HUM.UIT.NO OR FEEDBACK@DIVVUN.NO

!! # SKOLT SAAMI PROPERNOUN MORPHOLOGY 

!LEXICON FIRSTTAG
!! THE LEXICON *@LEXNAME@* ASSIGNS THE TAG +Attr
!+Attr: # ;
!!@U.CAP.OBL@+Attr:@U.CAP.OBL@ # ;  FOR REFERENCE: SME ENTRY.


LEXICON PROP_
! THIS LEXICON ''@LEXNAME@'' ASSIGNS THE TAG , AND IS JUST A DUMMY.
FOREIGNNAME_CASES  ;

LEXICON SURNAME_DUMMY
+Sg+Nom: # ;
+Sg+Com:%>in # ;

LEXICON PROP_SEM/PLC_
+Sem/Plc: FOREIGNNAME_CASES ;

!!
LEXICON PROP_TOP_
PROP_SEM/PLC_ ;

LEXICON PROP_ITKONEN_sur ! Itkonen:Itko C-FI-NEN-sur
+Sem/Sur: NMN_ITKONEN ;

LEXICON PROP_1Â_ATOM_plc_err_orth
+Err/Orth: PROP_1Â_ATOM_plc ;
LEXICON PROP_1Â_ATOM_plc
+Sem/Plc: ATTESTED-TOPONYM-STEM ;
+Sem/Plc: PROP_1Â_ATOM ;
LEXICON PROP_ESAI_mal !
+Sem/Mal: PROP_ESAI ;
LEXICON PROP_ESAI !Miiklai+N+Prop:Miikla^1VOW{ʹØ}i
NMN_ESAI ;
LEXICON PROP_OQLSSI_mal !Oʹlssi+N+Prop:Oʹlss
+Sem/Mal: NMN_OQLSSI ;
!LEXICON PROP_TOP_CHUOSHKK
! PROP_CHUOSHKK_plc ;
LEXICON PROP_CHUOSHKK_plc
: ATTESTED-TOPONYM-STEM ;
PROP_CHUOSHKK ;

!LEXICON PROP_TOP_5Y_VK_VVGG
! PROP_5Y_VK_VVGG_plc ;
LEXICON PROP_5Y_VK_VVGG_plc
: ATTESTED-TOPONYM-STEM ;
PROP_5Y_VK_VVGG ;

!LEXICON PROP_TOP_5Y_VS_VVZZ
! PROP_5Y_VS_VVZZ_plc ;
LEXICON PROP_5Y_VS_VVZZ_plc
+Sem/Plc: ATTESTED-TOPONYM-STEM ;
+Sem/Plc: PROP_5Y_VS_VVZZ ;

!LEXICON PROP_TOP_AANAR
! PROP_AANAR_plc ;
LEXICON PROP_AANAR_plc
+Sem/Plc: ATTESTED-TOPONYM-STEM ;
+Sem/Plc: PROP_AANAR ;

!LEXICON PROP_TOP_AELDD_PL
! PROP_AELDD_PL_plc ;
LEXICON PROP_AELDD_PL_plc
N_AELDD_PL ;

!LEXICON PROP_TOP_JEAQNNN
!  PROP_TOP_JEAQNNN_plc ;
!LEXICON PROP_JEAQNNN_plc
!:^PAL ATTESTED-TOPONYM-STEM ;
! PROP_JEAQNNN ;

!LEXICON PROP_TOP_TAQHTT
! PROP_TAQHTT_plc ;
LEXICON PROP_TAQHTT_plc
:^PAL ATTESTED-TOPONYM-STEM ;
 PROP_TAQHTT ;

!LEXICON PROP_TOP_1E_EAQYKK
! PROP_1E_EAQYKK_plc ;
LEXICON PROP_1E_EAQYKK_plc
:^PAL ATTESTED-TOPONYM-STEM ;
: NMN_1E_EAQYKK ;
!LEXICON PROP_TOP_JEAQRMM
! PROP_JEAQRMM_plc ;
LEXICON PROP_JEAQRMM_plc
:^PAL ATTESTED-TOPONYM-STEM ;
PROP_JEAQRMM ;
!LEXICON PROP_TOP_JUEQLGHGH
!PROP_JUEQLGHGH_plc ;
LEXICON PROP_JUEQLGHGH_plc
:^PALE^PAL ATTESTED-TOPONYM-STEM ;
PROP_JUEQLGHGH ;
!LEXICON PROP_TOP_JAEUQRR
! PROP_JAEUQRR_plc ;
LEXICON PROP_JAEUQRR_plc
+Sem/Plc:^PAL ATTESTED-TOPONYM-STEM ;
+Sem/Plc:PROP_JAEUQRR ;
!LEXICON PROP_TOP_KUYLAZH
! PROP_TOP_KUYLAZH ;
LEXICON PROP_KUYLAZH_plc
+Sem/Plc:až ATTESTED-TOPONYM-STEM ;
+Sem/Plc: PROP_KUYLAZH ;
!LEXICON PROP_TOP_KUEQLL
! PROP_KUEQLL_plc ;
LEXICON PROP_KUEQLL_plc
:^PALE^PAL ATTESTED-TOPONYM-STEM ;
PROP_KUEQLL ;
!LEXICON PROP_TOP_KUSS
! PROP_KUSS_plc ;
!LEXICON PROP_KUSS_plc
!: ATTESTED-TOPONYM-STEM ;
!PROP_KUSS ;
!LEXICON PROP_TOP_KOALVAK
! PROP_KOALVAK_plc ;
LEXICON PROP_KOALVAK_plc
+Sem/Plc: ATTESTED-TOPONYM-STEM ;
+Sem/Plc: PROP_KOALVAK ;

LEXICON PROP_1E_VQYXX_plc
+Sem/Plc: NMN_1E_VQYXX ;
!LEXICON PROP_TOP_KAQLBB
! PROP_1E_VQYXX_plc ;
!LEXICON PROP_KAQLBB_plc
! PROP_1E_VQYXX_plc ;
LEXICON PROP_1E_VQYXX_plc
+Sem/Plc:^PAL ATTESTED-TOPONYM-STEM ;
+Sem/Plc: PROP_1E_VQYXX ;
!LEXICON PROP_TOP_KAQLBB_PL
! PROP_1E_VQYXX_PL_plc ;
LEXICON PROP_1E_VQYXX_PL_plc
+Sem/Plc:^PAL ATTESTED-TOPONYM-STEM ;
+Sem/Plc: NMN_1E_VQYXX_PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_TOP_LUUBBYL
! PROP_LUUBBYL_plc ;
LEXICON PROP_LUUBBYL_plc
+Sem/Plc:^Pen^V2VV ATTESTED-TOPONYM-STEM ;
+Sem/Plc: PROP_LUUBBYL ;
!LEXICON PROP_TOP_MUORR
! PROP_MUORR_plc ;
LEXICON PROP_MUORR_plc
+Sem/Plc: ATTESTED-TOPONYM-STEM ;
+Sem/Plc: PROP_MUORR ;
!LEXICON PROP_TOP_MAADD
! PROP_MAADD_plc ;
LEXICON PROP_MAADD_plc
+Sem/Plc:^VV2V ATTESTED-TOPONYM-STEM ;
+Sem/Plc: PROP_MAADD ;

!LEXICON PROP_TOP_OULU
! PROP_OULU_plc ;
LEXICON PROP_OULU_plc
+Sem/Plc: ATTESTED-TOPONYM-STEM ;
+Sem/Plc: PROP_OULU ;
!LEXICON PROP_TOP_PAARR
! PROP_PAARR_plc ;
LEXICON PROP_PAARR_plc
+Sem/Plc: ATTESTED-TOPONYM-STEM ;
+Sem/Plc: PROP_PAARR ;
!LEXICON PROP_TOP_1Â_VCC
! PROP_1Â_VCC_plc ;
LEXICON PROP_1Â_VCC_plc
: ATTESTED-TOPONYM-STEM ;
PROP_1Â_VCC ;
LEXICON PROP_1Â_VCC_plc
+Sem/Plc: ATTESTED-TOPONYM-STEM ;
+Sem/Plc: PROP_1Â_VCC ;
!LEXICON PROP_TOP_PESS
! PROP_PESS_plc ;
LEXICON PROP_PESS_plc
+Sem/Plc: ATTESTED-TOPONYM-STEM ;
+Sem/Plc: PROP_PESS ;
!LEXICON PROP_TOP_PLAAN
! PROP_PLAAN_plc ;
LEXICON PROP_PLAAN_plc
+Sem/Plc: ATTESTED-TOPONYM-STEM ;
+Sem/Plc: PROP_PLAAN ;
!LEXICON PROP_TOP_PUOAVV
! PROP_PUOAVV_plc ;
LEXICON PROP_PUOAVV_plc
+Sem/Plc: ATTESTED-TOPONYM-STEM ;
+Sem/Plc: PROP_PUOAVV ;
!LEXICON PROP_TOP_RUOCCC
! PROP_RUOCCC_plc ;
LEXICON PROP_RUOCCC_plc
+Sem/Plc: ATTESTED-TOPONYM-STEM ;
+Sem/Plc: PROP_RUOCCC ;
!LEXICON PROP_TOP_SIJDD
! PROP_SIJDD_plc ;
LEXICON PROP_SIJDD_plc
+Sem/Plc: ATTESTED-TOPONYM-STEM ;
+Sem/Plc: PROP_SIJDD ;

!LEXICON PROP_TOP_SUYL
! PROP_SUYL_plc ;
LEXICON PROP_SUYL_plc
+Sem/Plc:^VOWLower^CCC2C ATTESTED-TOPONYM-STEM ;
+Sem/Plc: PROP_SUYL ;
!LEXICON PROP_TOP_SAAQMM
! PROP_SAAQMM_plc ;
!LEXICON PROP_SAAQMM_plc
!: ATTESTED-TOPONYM-STEM ;
!PROP_SAAQMM ;
!LEXICON PROP_TOP_TOLL
! PROP_TOLL_plc ;
LEXICON PROP_TOLL_plc
+Sem/Plc: ATTESTED-TOPONYM-STEM ;
+Sem/Plc: PROP_TOLL ;
LEXICON PROP_IN_A_top
+Sem/Plc: ATTESTED-TOPONYM-STEM ;
+Sem/Plc: PROP_IN_A ;

!LEXICON PROP_TOP_TRUUBA
! PROP_TRUUBA_plc ;
LEXICON PROP_TRUUBA_plc
+Sem/Plc: ATTESTED-TOPONYM-STEM ;
+Sem/Plc: PROP_TRUUBA ;
!LEXICON PROP_TOP_TUODDYR
! PROP_TUODDYR_plc ;
LEXICON PROP_TUODDYR_plc
+Sem/Plc: ATTESTED-TOPONYM-STEM ;
+Sem/Plc: PROP_TUODDYR ;
!LEXICON PROP_TOP_SAJOS
!: ATTESTED-TOPONYM-STEM ;
!PROP_SAJOS ;
!LEXICON PROP_TOP_VUEAIQVV
! PROP_VUEAIQVV_plc ;
LEXICON PROP_VUEAIQVV_plc
+Sem/Plc:^PALẸ^PAL ATTESTED-TOPONYM-STEM ;
+Sem/Plc: PROP_VUEAIQVV ;
!LEXICON PROP_TOP_1E_VQCC
! PROP_1E_VQCC_plc ;
LEXICON PROP_1E_VQCC_plc
+Sem/Plc:^PAL ATTESTED-TOPONYM-STEM ;
+Sem/Plc: PROP_1E_VQCC ;
!!
LEXICON PROP_1Â_VKK_plc
+Sem/Plc: PROP_1Â_VKK ;
LEXICON PROP_1Â_VKK
 NMN_1Â_VKK ;

LEXICON PROP_1Â_VCC !!= * @CODE@ papp:pa^1VOW{ʹØ}pp
NMN_1Â_VCC ;

!LEXICON PROP_TOP_1Â_VKK_VVGG
! PROP_1Â_VKK_VVGG_plc ;
LEXICON PROP_1Â_VKK_VVGG_plc
+Sem/Plc: NMN_1Â_VKK_VVGG ;
LEXICON PROP_1Â_VKK_VVGG !!= * @CODE@ jokk:jo^1VOW{ʹØ}kk
 NMN_1Â_VKK_VVGG ;

LEXICON PROP_TOLL
: NMN_TOLL ;
LEXICON PROP_PAARR
: NMN_PAARR ;

!LEXICON PROP_TOP_1Â_VYXX
! PROP_1Â_VYXX_Plc ;
LEXICON PROP_1Â_VYXX_Plc !!= * @CODE@ põrtt:põ^1VOW{ʹØ}rtt
+Sem/Plc: NMN_1Â_VYXX ;

LEXICON PROP_1Â_VYXX_PL_Plc !!= * @CODE@ põrtt:põ^1VOW{ʹØ}rtt
+Sem/Plc: NMN_1Â_VYXX_PL ;

LEXICON PROP_1Â_VYXX  !!= * @CODE@ põrtt:põ^1VOW{ʹØ}rtt
 NMN_1Â_VYXX ;
!LEXICON PROP_TOP_1Â_VYKK
! PROP_1Â_VYKK_plc ;
LEXICON PROP_1Â_VYKK_plc !!= * @CODE@ algg:a^1VOW{ʹØ}lgg
+Sem/Plc: NMN_1Â_VYKK ;
LEXICON PROP_1Â_VYKK !!= * @CODE@ algg:a^1VOW{ʹØ}lgg
 NMN_1Â_VYKK ;
LEXICON PROP_1Â_VWYKK !!= * @CODE@ algg:a^1VOW{ʹØ}lgg
 NMN_1Â_VWYKK ;

LEXICON PROP_1Â_VYXX_PL_plc
+Sem/Plc: NMN_1Â_VYXX_PL ;
LEXICON PROP_1Â_VYXX_plc
+Sem/Plc: NMN_1Â_VYXX ;
LEXICON PROP_ALGG
!: NMN_ALGG ;
 NMN_1Â_VYXX ;
LEXICON PROP_1Â_VUKK !!= * @CODE@ joukk:jo^1VOWu{ʹØ}kk
 NMN_1Â_VUKK ;
LEXICON PROP_1Â_VUCC_plc !!= * @CODE@ autt:a^1VOWu{ʹØ}tt
+Sem/Plc PROP_1Â_VUCC ;
LEXICON PROP_1Â_VUCC !!= * @CODE@ autt:a^1VOWu{ʹØ}tt
!: NMN_AUTT ;
 NMN_1Â_VUCC ;
LEXICON PROP_PUOAVV
: NMN_PUOAVV ;
LEXICON PROP_1Â_VWCC !! muõrr
: NMN_1Â_VWCC ;
LEXICON PROP_MUORR
!: NMN_MUORR ;
: NMN_1Â_VWCC ;
LEXICON PROP_MAADD
: NMN_MAADD ;
LEXICON PROP_1Â_VWCCC !! Ruõšš:Ruõ{ʹØ}šˈš
NMN_1Â_VWCCC ;
LEXICON PROP_RUOCCC
!: NMN_RUOCCC ;
NMN_1Â_VWCCC ;

LEXICON PROP_CHUOSHKK
: NMN_CHUOSHKK ;
LEXICON PROP_1E_VVQCC !!= * @CODE@ sääʹmm:sää{ʹØ}mm
NMN_1E_VVQCC ;

!LEXICON PROP_TOP_1E_VVQCC
!: NMN_1E_VVQCC ;
LEXICON PROP_1E_VVQCC_plc
+Sem/Plc:^PAL ATTESTED-TOPONYM-STEM ;
+Sem/Plc: NMN_1E_VVQCC ;
LEXICON PROP_1E_VWQCC
 NMN_1E_VWQCC ;
LEXICON PROP_KUEQLL
!: NMN_KUEQLL ;
 NMN_1E_VWQCC ;
LEXICON PROP_JUEQLGHGH
: NMN_JUEQLGHGH ;
LEXICON PROP_VUEAIQVV
: NMN_VUEAIQVV ;
!LEXICON PROP_TOP_1E_EAQKKK
! PROP_1E_EAQKKK_plc ;
LEXICON PROP_1E_EAQKKK_plc
+Sem/Plc: NMN_1E_EAQKKK ;
!LEXICON PROP_JEAQNNN
!: NMN_JEAQNNN ;
LEXICON PROP_JEAQRMM
: NMN_JEAQRMM ;
LEXICON PROP_TAQHTT
: NMN_TAQHTT ;

LEXICON PROP_KHEQDD_plc
+Sem/Plc: NMN_KHEQDD ;

LEXICON PROP_NUORTI_plc
+Sem/Plc: NMN_NUORTI ;

!LEXICON PROP_KHEQRJJ
!: NMN_KHEQRJJ ;

!!
!LEXICON PROP_DIQLL
!: NMN_DIQLL ;
!LEXICON PROP_KRIQLCC
!: NMN_KRIQLCC ;
LEXICON PROP_KRIQLCC_PL
: NMN_KRIQLCC_PL ;
LEXICON PROP_NEUQLL
: NMN_NEUQLL ;

!LEXICON PROP_CHIOQLJ
!: NMN_CHIOQLJ ;
LEXICON PROP_CHIOQLJ_plc
+Sem/Plc: NMN_CHIOQLJ ;

!LEXICON PROP_JIQLSSI
!: NMN_JIQLSSI ;
!LEXICON PROP_PRSPRCÂ_VYXX-I
!: NMN_PRSPRCÂ_VYXX-I ;
LEXICON PROP_PRSPRCE_VQYXX-I
: NMN_PRSPRCE_VQYXX-I ;

!LEXICON PROP_SEM/PLC_PESS
!+Sem/Plc: NMN_PESS ;



!LEXICON PROP_SEM/PLC_SLOOHMAN
!+Sem/Plc: NMN_SLOOHMAN ;
LEXICON PROP_1A_VCC
 NMN_1A_VCC ;
LEXICON PROP_PESS
!: NMN_PESS ;
 NMN_1A_VCC ;
LEXICON PROP_JARPLAAN
: NMN_JARPLAAN ;
LEXICON PROP_1Â_ATOM
: NMN_1Â_ATOM ;

LEXICON PROP_TUODDYR
: NMN_TUODDYR ;
LEXICON PROP_KOONTYR
: NMN_KOONTYR ;

LEXICON PROP_LUUBBYL
: NMN_LUUBBYL ;

LEXICON PROP_KOALVAK
: NMN_KOALVAK ;
!LEXICON PROP_AACCIKH
!: NMN_AACCIKH ;
LEXICON PROP_5Y_VK_VVGG
 NMN_5Y_VK_VVGG ;
LEXICON PROP_5Y_VS_VVZZ
 NMN_5Y_VS_VVZZ ;
LEXICON PROP_IILYSKH
: NMN_IILYSKH ;

!LEXICON PROP_SAQPPLI
!: NMN_SAQPPLI ;

!LEXICON PROP_OAQLGA !!= * @CODE@ Ååʹlga:Ååʹlg
!: NMN_OAQLGA ;

!LEXICON  PROP_SINIDA !!= * @CODE@ Sinida:Sinid
!: NMN_SINIDA ;


LEXICON PROP_SUYL
: NMN_SUYL ;

!LEXICON PROP_SEM/PLC_TOLL
!+Sem/Plc: NMN_TOLL_PLC ;

!LEXICON PROP_KUSS
!: NMN_KUSS ;
!LEXICON PROP_SEM/PLC_KUSS
!+Sem/Plc: NMN_KUSS_PLC ;

!LEXICON PROP_SEM/PLC_PAARR
!+Sem/Plc: NMN_PAARR ;

!LEXICON PROP_SEM/PLC_SIJDD
!+Sem/Plc: NMN_SIJDD ;

!LEXICON PROP_SEM/PLC_UHSS
!+Sem/Plc: NMN_UHSS ;

!LEXICON PROP_SEM/PLC_ALGG
!+Sem/Plc: NMN_ALGG ;

!LEXICON PROP_SEM/PLC_MUORR
!+Sem/Plc: NMN_MUORR ;

!LEXICON PROP_SEM/PLC_PUOAVV
!+Sem/Plc: NMN_PUOAVV ;

!LEXICON PROP_SEM/PLC_CHUOSHKK
!+Sem/Plc: NMN_CHUOSHKK ;

LEXICON PROP_1Â_VVC !!= * @CODE@ plaan:plaa{ʹØ}n
 NMN_1Â_VVC ;
LEXICON PROP_PLAAN
!: NMN_PLAAN ;
 NMN_1Â_VVC ;
!LEXICON PROP_SEM/PLC_PLAAN
!+Sem/Plc: NMN_PLAAN ;
LEXICON PROP_1A_VWYXX
: NMN_1A_VWYXX ;

LEXICON PROP_1A_VYXX
 NMN_1A_VYXX ;
LEXICON PROP_AELDD
!: NMN_AELDD ;
 NMN_1A_VYXX ;

LEXICON PROP_PEIGG
: NMN_PEIGG ;

LEXICON PROP_FEDD !!= * @CODE@ Fedd:Fẹ^1VOWdd
: NMN_FEDD ;

LEXICON PROP_MUQZEI
: NMN_MUQZEI ;

LEXICON PROP_1E_EQYXX
 NMN_1E_EQYXX ;
LEXICON PROP_TEQSTT
!: NMN_TEQSTT ;
 NMN_1E_EQYXX ;

!LEXICON PROP_SEM/PLC_1E_VQCC
!+Sem/Plc: NMN_1E_VQCC ;


!LEXICON PROP_SEM/PLC_CHAAQCC
!+Sem/Plc: NMN_CHAAQCC ;

!LEXICON PROP_SEM/PLC_JAEUQRR
!+Sem/Plc: NMN_JAEUQRR ;
!LEXICON PROP_TOP_1E_VUQKK
! PROP_1E_VUQKK_plc ;
LEXICON PROP_1E_VUQKK_plc  !!= * @CODE@ päiʹǩǩ:pä^1VOWi{ʹØ}kk
+Sem/Plc: NMN_1E_VUQKK ;
LEXICON PROP_1E_VUQCC_plc  !!= * @CODE@ jäuʹrr:jä^1VOWu{ʹØ}rr
+Sem/Plc: PROP_1E_VUQCC ;
LEXICON PROP_1E_VUQCC  !!= * @CODE@ jäuʹrr:jä^1VOWu{ʹØ}rr
 NMN_1E_VUQCC ;
!LEXICON PROP_JAEUQRR_sur
!!: NMN_JAEUQRR ;
!+Sem/Sur: PROP_JAEUQRR ;
LEXICON PROP_JAEUQRR
!: NMN_JAEUQRR ;
 NMN_1E_VUQCC ;

LEXICON PROP_CHEEUQRES_plc
+Sem/Plc: NMN_CHEEUQRES ;
LEXICON PROP_PIEAQSS_plc
+Sem/Plc: NMN_PIEAQSS ;

LEXICON PROP_2A_SYYV_plc
+Sem/Plc: NMN_2A_SYYV ;

!LEXICON PROP_TOP_1E_VQKK
! PROP_1E_VQKK_plc ;
LEXICON PROP_1E_VQKK_plc !!= * @CODE@ čåʹǩǩ:čå^1VOW{ʹØ}kk
+Sem/Plc: NMN_1E_VQKK ;
LEXICON PROP_1E_VQKK !!= * @CODE@ čåʹǩǩ:čå^1VOW{ʹØ}kk
 NMN_1E_VQKK ;
LEXICON PROP_1E_VQCC !!= * @CODE@ väʹll:vä^1VOW{ʹØ}ll
 NMN_1E_VQCC ;

LEXICON PROP_PEIQVV_plc
+Sem/Plc: PROP_PEIQVV ;
LEXICON PROP_PEIQVV
: NMN_PEIQVV ;
LEXICON PROP_1E_EQCC !!Jeʹff
 NMN_1E_EQCC ;
